Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
вандал╕зм/C
вареннячко/M
ватин/C
велоспорт/C
верховенство/M
вербувальник/C
вушок/C
вивертання/M
вигоряння/M
вищипування/M
викроювання/M
вилупок/C
вимикання/M
виправлення/M
висипання/M
високог╕р'я/M
витязь/C
виявлення/M
в╕дведення/M
в╕денець/C
в╕дкладення/M
в╕дмочування/M
в╕дробляння/M
в╕дскок/C
в╕дторгання/M
в╕ко/M
в╕русолог/C
в╕яло/M
вкладник/C
враження/M
взяття/M
вовк/C
водопостачання/M
вольт/C
во╓водство/M
гачок/C
гарант/C
газомет/C
гегельянство/M
генерал╕тет/C
герой/C
гуляш/C
г╕дрид/C
г╕перзвук/C
глек/C
глинище/M
графин/C
грузин/C
громадянство/M
голубник/C
горщик/C
гор╕ння/M
файл/C
фас/C
фермент/C
фермерство/M
фурор/C
ф╕з╕оном╕ст/C
френолог/C
формфактор/C
фотографування/M
фотомонтаж/C
желатин/C
жиклер/C
жито/M
авантюризм/C
автоклав/C
автотранспорт/C
агрегатування/M
африкан╕ст/C
аеропо╖зд/C
акумулятор/C
актин╕й/C
акторство/M
альбум╕н/C
аломорф/C
амонал/C
анарх╕ст/C
антабус/C
антисем╕т/C
апартамент/C
апелювання/M
арагон╕т/C
арс╕н/C
арх╕╓пископ/C
астронавт/C
азбестоцемент/C
аборт/C
дв╕йникування/M
дальтон╕зм/C
децибел/C
делегування/M
демонтаж/C
десантник/C
дуло/M
дуплет/C
дифтонг/C
дисидент/C
дихання/M
д╕алектолог/C
драматург/C
древо/M
дюраль/C
дов╕р'я/M
долом╕т/C
домоводство/M
дозв╕лля/M
добавок/C
екв╕валент/C
екстрактор/C
електроживлення/M
електрон/C
енергонагляд/C
ескалатор/C
Юл╕й/C
ув╕чнення/M
укладання/M
улюбленець/C
умовчання/M
урахування/M
усиновлення/M
усп╕х/C
утирання/M
узаконення/M
чаклунство/M
часток╕л/C
чуваш/C
число/M
чорнокнижник/C
цв╕т╕ння/M
цвях/C
циклон/C
Агафон/C
Айдахо/M
Аламос/C
Брянськ/C
╕удей/C
╕мпорт/C
╕накомислення/M
╕нд╕й/C
╕нтерферометр/C
╕сторик/C
Кал╕мантан/C
Коломбо/M
кв╕тник/C
камуфлювання/M
канцеляризм/C
карниз/C
кахель/C
керування/M
кулон/C
кип╕ння/M
кип'ятильник/C
к╕ношник/C
клопотання/M
книго╖д/C
крильце/M
кришталик/C
кодування/M
кока╖н╕ст/C
ком╕сар╕ат/C
комп╕лювання/M
концерн/C
конярство/M
кордебалет/C
коромисло/M
кобальт/C
лазарет/C
легування/M
лижник/C
лико/M
л╕дерство/M
л╕сокомб╕нат/C
л╕точислення/M
Монтерей/C
майно/M
макрель/C
марк╕рування/M
марнотратник/C
медал╕ст/C
меценатство/M
метис/C
мурло/M
миротворець/C
мито/M
м╕номет/C
м╕сництво/M
модерн╕зм/C
молоко/M
мореплавець/C
нагадування/M
наждак/C
надбання/M
нанесення/M
нап╕врозпад/C
народовладдя/M
натягнення/M
ньюфаундленд/C
невиконання/M
нейтрино/M
неп/C
нетравлення/M
н╕труванння/M
нянькин/C
паливо/M
палтус/C
пародист/C
печиво/M
пен╕цил╕н/C
перев'язання/M
передсердя/M
перекодування/M
перенапруження/M
переродження/M
перетворювач/C
перехрещення/M
перо/M
пупок/C
пихт╕ння/M
п╕дгортання/M
п╕дкопування/M
п╕длабузник/C
п╕дпри╓мництво/M
п╕дточення/M
Р╕ко/M
п╕суар/C
плющення/M
пломб╕р/C
представництво/M
пригинання/M
причеп/C
приклеювання/M
припаювання/M
притиснення/M
провалля/M
провулок/C
продовольство/M
проникнення/M
прон╕с/C
прострочення/M
проходження/M
птеродактиль/C
пов╕тря/M
погодження/M
пощипування/M
поле/M
полин/C
помело/M
поранення/M
поручитель/C
послання/M
потиснення/M
позбавлення/M
пояс/C
побрязкування/M
ракетодром/C
регентство/M
рефлектор/C
Серг╕й/C
ретушування/M
рик/C
рикання/M
р╕шення/M
ролик/C
розгойдування/M
роздягання/M
роз╕гр╕вання/M
розкорчовування/M
розм'якшення/M
розпл╕дник/C
розривання/M
розставляння/M
розходження/M
свинство/M
свято/M
сферо╖д/C
самов╕лля/M
самонав╕яння/M
самозаспоко╓ння/M
санатор╕й/C
село/M
сем╕т/C
сум╕щення/M
супергетерод╕н/C
синець/C
сито/M
скарбник/C
скиглення/M
скрикування/M
сл╕дство/M
смичок/C
спаровування/M
сп╕дометр/C
сплавлення/M
спов╕щення/M
спотикання/M
стенд/C
стебло/M
стягнення/M
столик/C
совання/M
Тобол/C
творення/M
табурет/C
терпуг/C
терп╕ння/M
титан/C
т╕льце/M
трепетання/M
труп/C
товариш/C
томлення/M
звалювання/M
звукозапис/C
зв╕дництво/M
згладжування/M
зав'язнення/M
задушення/M
заклепування/M
закр╕йник/C
замкнення/M
запозичення/M
заступництво/M
затиск/C
забивання/M
зубр╕ння/M
злочин/C
змочування/M
з'╓днання/M
Давенпорт/C
шаленство/M
шанс/C
шило/M
шлагбаум/C
шофер/C
юнацтво/M
хл╕в/C
хормейстер/C
багатоземелля/M
бамбук/C
баст╕он/C
бензосховище/M
бережок/C
букво╖дство/M
бульк╕т/C
б╕цепс/C
благод╕яння/M
блудник/C
бронеавтомоб╕ль/C
богов╕дступництво/M
бор/C
Пантелеймон/C
одурманення/M
оком╕р/C
опечатання/M
орач/C
ослаб╕ння/M
обвинувачення/M
оберемок/C
обладнання/M
обожнювання/M
